Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. General Definitions and Principles of Interpretation.

Secs. 45.01.201 — 45.01.208.
General definitions and principles of interpretation. [Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 45.01.211.
General definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, words or phrases defined in this section, or in the additional definitions contained in other chapters of the code that apply to particular chapters or articles of the code, have the meanings stated.

Subject to definitions contained in other chapters of the code that apply to particular chapters or articles of the code,

“action,” in the sense of a judicial proceeding, includes recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity, and another proceeding in which rights are determined;

“aggrieved party” means a party entitled to pursue a remedy;

“agreement,” as distinguished from “contract,” means the bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade as provided in AS

45.01.303

;

“bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company;

“bearer” means a person in control of a negotiable electronic document of title or a person in possession of a negotiable instrument, negotiable tangible document of title, or certificated security that is payable to bearer or endorsed in blank;

“bill of lading” means a document of title evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of directly or indirectly transporting or forwarding goods; “bill of lading” does not include a warehouse receipt;

“branch” includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of a bank;

“burden of establishing” a fact means the burden of persuading the trier of fact that the existence of the fact is more probable than its nonexistence;

“buyer in ordinary course of business” means a person who buys goods in good faith, without knowledge that the sale violates the rights of another person in the goods, and in the ordinary course from a person, other than a pawnbroker, in the business of selling goods of that kind; a person buys goods in the ordinary course if the sale to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller’s own usual or customary practices; a person who sells oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of selling goods of that kind; a buyer in ordinary course of business may buy for cash, by exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and may acquire goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for sale; only a buyer who takes possession of the goods or has a right to recover the goods from the seller under AS 45.02 may be a buyer in ordinary course of business; “buyer in ordinary course of business” does not include a person who acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt;

“code” means AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29;

“conspicuous,” with reference to a term, means written, displayed, or presented in a way that a reasonable person against whom it is to operate ought to have noticed it; whether a term is “conspicuous” or not is a decision for the court; conspicuous terms include

a heading in capitals equal to or greater in size than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same or lesser size; and

language in the body of a record or display in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language;

“consumer” means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

“contract,” as distinguished from “agreement,” means the total legal obligation that results from the parties’ agreement as determined by the code as supplemented by other applicable laws;

“creditor” includes a general creditor, a secured creditor, a lien creditor, and a representative of creditors, including an assignee for the benefit of creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy, a receiver in equity, and an executor or administrator of an insolvent debtor’s or assignor’s estate;

“defendant” includes a person in the position of defendant in a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim;

“delivery,” with respect to an electronic document of title, means voluntary transfer of control and, with respect to an instrument, a tangible document of title, or chattel paper, means voluntary transfer of possession;

“document of title”

means a record that

in the regular course of business or financing, is treated as adequately evidencing that the person in possession or control of the record is entitled to receive, control, hold, and dispose of the record and the goods the record covers; and

purports to be issued by or addressed to a bailee and to cover goods in the bailee’s possession that are either identified or are fungible portions of an identified mass;

includes a bill of lading, transport document, dock warrant, dock receipt, warehouse receipt, and order for delivery of goods;

“electronic document of title” means a document of title evidenced by a record consisting of information stored in an electronic medium;

“fault” means a default, breach, or wrongful act or omission;

“fungible goods” means goods

of which a unit, by nature or usage of trade, is the equivalent of another like unit; or

that, by agreement, are treated as equivalent;

“genuine” means free of forgery or counterfeiting;

“good faith,” except as otherwise provided in AS 45.05, means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing;

“holder” means the person in

possession of a negotiable instrument that is payable either to bearer or to an identified person who is the person in possession;

possession of a negotiable tangible document of title if the goods are deliverable either to bearer or to the order of the person in possession; or

control of a negotiable electronic document of title;

“insolvency proceeding” includes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or another proceeding intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person involved;

“insolvent” means

having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of bona fide dispute;

being unable to pay debts as they become due; or

being insolvent within the meaning of federal bankruptcy law;

“money” means a medium of exchange currently authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government, and includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more countries;

“organization” means a person other than an individual;

“party,” as distinguished from “third party,” means a person who has engaged in a transaction or made an agreement subject to the code;

“pawnbroker” has the meaning given in AS

08.76.590

;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or another legal or commercial entity;

“present value” means the amount as of a date certain of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain

by use of an interest rate that is specified by the parties if that rate is not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into; or

if an interest rate is not determined under (A) of this paragraph, by use of a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into;

“purchase” means taking by sale, lease, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, security interest, issue or reissue, gift, or another voluntary transaction creating an interest in property;

“purchaser” means a person who takes by purchase;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“remedy” means a remedial right to which an aggrieved party is entitled with or without resort to a tribunal;

“representative” means a person empowered to act for another, including an agent, an officer of a corporation or association, and a trustee, executor, or administrator of an estate;

“right” includes remedy;

“security interest” means an interest in personal property or fixtures that secures payment or performance of an obligation; “security interest” includes an interest of a consignor and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible, or a promissory note in a transaction that is subject to AS 45.29; “security interest” does not include the special property interest of a buyer of goods on identification of those goods to a contract for sale under AS

45.02.401

, but a buyer may also acquire a security interest by complying with AS 45.29; except as otherwise provided in AS

45.02.505

, the right of a seller or lessor of goods under AS 45.02 or AS 45.12 to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not a security interest, but a seller or lessor may also acquire a security interest by complying with AS 45.29; the retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer under AS

45.02.401

is limited in effect to a reservation of a security interest; whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a security interest is determined under AS

45.01.213

;

“send,” in connection with a writing, record, or notice, means

to deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by a usual means of communication with postage or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument, to an address specified on the instrument or otherwise agreed on, or, if an address is not specified on the instrument or otherwise agreed on, to an address reasonable under the circumstances; or

in another way to cause to be received a record or notice within the time it would have arrived if properly sent;

“signed” includes using a symbol executed or adopted with present intention to adopt or accept a writing;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“surety” includes a guarantor or other secondary obligor;

“tangible document of title” means a document of title evidenced by a record consisting of information that is inscribed on a tangible medium;

“term” means a portion of an agreement that relates to a particular matter;

“unauthorized signature” means a signature made without actual, implied, or apparent authority, and includes a forgery;

“warehouse receipt” means a document of title issued by a warehouse; in this paragraph, “warehouse” has the meaning given in AS

45.07.112(a)

;

“writing” includes printing, typewriting, or another intentional reduction to tangible form; “written” has a corresponding meaning.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009; am § 6 ch 49 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (b)(29) was enacted as (b)(47) and renumbered in 2010, at which time former paragraphs (b)(29)—(46) were renumbered as (b)(30)—(47).

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, added the definition of “pawnbroker” in (b).

Sec. 45.01.212.
Notice; knowledge.

Subject to (f) of this section, a person has “notice” of a fact if the person

has actual knowledge of it;

has received a notice or notification of it; or

from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know that it exists.

“Knowledge” means actual knowledge. “Knows” has a corresponding meaning.

“Discover,” “learn,” or words of similar import refer to knowledge rather than to reason to know.

A person “notifies” or “gives” a notice or notification to another person by taking those steps that may be reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person actually comes to know of it.

Subject to (f) of this section, a person “receives” a notice or notification when it

comes to that person’s attention; or

is duly delivered in a form reasonable under the circumstances at the place of business through which the contract was made or at another location held out by that person as the place for receipt of that type of communication.

Notice, knowledge, or a notice or notification received by an organization is effective for a particular transaction from the time it is brought to the attention of the individual conducting that transaction and, in any event, from the time it would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the organization had exercised due diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the person conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting for the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.213.
Lease distinguished from security interest.

Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a lease or security interest is determined by the facts of each case.

A transaction in the form of a lease creates a security interest if the consideration that the lessee is to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is an obligation for the term of the lease and is not subject to termination by the lessee, and the

original term of the lease is equal to or greater than the remaining economic life of the goods;

lessee is bound to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods or is bound to become the owner of the goods;

lessee has an option to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods for no additional consideration or for nominal additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement; or

lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for no additional consideration or for nominal additional consideration on compliance with the lease agreement.

A transaction in the form of a lease does not create a security interest merely because the

present value of the consideration the lessee is obligated to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is substantially equal to or greater than the fair market value of the goods at the time the lease is entered into;

lessee assumes risk of loss of the goods;

lessee agrees to pay, with respect to the goods, taxes, insurance, filing, recording, or registration fees, or service or maintenance costs;

lessee has an option to renew the lease or to become the owner of the goods;

lessee has an option to renew the lease for a fixed rent that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal at the time the option is to be performed; or

lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for a fixed price that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market value of the goods at the time the option is to be performed.

Additional consideration is nominal if it is less than the lessee’s reasonably predictable cost of performing under the lease agreement if the option is not exercised. Additional consideration is not nominal if, when the option to

renew the lease is granted to the lessee, the rent is stated to be the fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal determined at the time the option is to be performed; or

become the owner of the goods is granted to the lessee, the price is stated to be the fair market value of the goods determined at the time the option is to be performed.

The remaining economic life of the goods and reasonably predictable fair market rent, fair market value, or cost of performing under the lease agreement must be determined with reference to the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.214.
Value.

Except as otherwise provided in AS 45.03, AS 45.04, and AS 45.05, a person gives value for rights if the person acquires them

in return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the extension of immediately available credit, whether or not drawn upon and whether or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of difficulties in collection;

as security for, or in total or partial satisfaction of, a preexisting claim;

by accepting delivery under a preexisting contract for purchase; or

in return for consideration sufficient to support a simple contract.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.215.
Reasonable time; seasonableness.

Whether a time for taking an action required by the code is reasonable depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of the action.

An action is taken seasonably if it is taken at or within the time agreed on or, if no time is agreed on, at or within a reasonable time.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.216.
Presumptions.

Whenever the code creates a presumption with respect to a fact, or provides that a fact is presumed, the trier of fact must find the existence of the fact unless and until evidence is introduced that supports a finding of the nonexistence of the fact.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.